Utah statutes.
57-6-8.   Improvements made by occupants of land granted to state.
Any person having improvements on any real estate granted to the state in aid
of any work of internal improvement, whose title thereto is questioned by
another, may remove such improvements without injury otherwise to such real
estate, at any time before he is evicted therefrom, or he may claim and have
the benefit of this chapter by proceeding as herein directed.
